src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

LEXICON adv
+Adv:%>0 K ;

LEXICON SHadv
+Adv+Sh:%>0 K ;

LEXICON CSadv
+Adv:%>0 # ;

LEXICON Adverb
aj adv ;
ájmujda adv ;
ajtu:ajt SHadv ;
aktan adv ;
aktelasj adv ; !adj
aktelis adv ; !adj ?
aktijrádálattjat adv ;
aktisattjat adv ;
alebuj adv ;!adj
allela adv ; !derived noun
allelij adv ; !derived noun
allet adv ;
almu adv ;
alvosláhkáj:alvos#láhkáj adv ; !lahke
alvvábun adv ; !adj
alás adv ; !
astelattja adv ; !adj + typo, asstelasj both in OK and AK
avtabále:avt#bále SHadv ; 
avtabále:avta#bále adv ;
avtagattjat adv ;
avtaláhkáj:avt#láhkáj SHadv ; 
avtajtjalmij:avtaj#tjalmij adv ; !
avtatrajes:avtat#rajes adv ; !
avtatrájes+Err/Orth:aktat#rájes adv ; !same as for avtatrajes
baddjen adv ; !
badjelasj adv ; 
badjelattjan adv ; !adj
badjen adv ; !
bahát adv ;
bajebuttjan adv ; !adj
bajemusán adv ; !adj
beludahkaj adv ; !
beru adv ;
biejvvet adv  ;
bigi adv ; !
biktjot adv ;
binnemusát adv ;
birraj adv ; !
birán adv ; !
bissusis adv ; !adj
boalbbot adv ;
boassjolis adv ; !
buohtalakkoj adv ;
buoremusláhkáj:buoremus#láhkáj adv ; !adj
bus adv ;
báhkan adv ; !noun
báldas adv ; !noun
bálldalakkoj adv ;
bárebuttjat adv ;
bådoj adv ;
bævrá adv ;
daggu adv ;
dajgu adv ;
dakkavide adv ;
dalloj adv ;
dallutjis+Err/Orth:dalutjis adv ; !adj
dalága CSadv ;
dalásæhkáj adv ;
danne adv ;
dannága CSadv ;
dannák CSadv ;
dasik CSadv ;
dassta adv ;
dasti adv ;
dasták CSadv ;
davebuj adv ; !comparable noun
davebuttjan adv ;  !comparable noun in dim
davvelij adv ; !derived noun
davvet adv ;
derdaj adv ;
desti adv ;
diehki:diehki adv ;
diehki:diek SHadv ; !use/-sub?
dimoj% dámoj adv ; !XXX se dimáj dámaj 
duobbel adv ; !
duobbelij adv ; !
duobbelt adv ; 
duodalabmusit adv ;
duoggu adv ;
duojgu adv ;
duola% degu+Use/MT:duola% degu adv ; !Lene
duolla adv ;
duolloj% dálloj adv ;
duoppe adv ; !
duoppelt adv ;
duosstelabmusit adv ;
dábbel adv ; !
dábbelattjan adv ; !
dábbelis adv ; !
dádjak adv ; !OK: "i år" - short form of dá jage??
dájage CSadv ; !two words??
dájná adv ;
dájvvot adv ;
dála adv ;
dálle adv ;
dálvebuttjat adv ;
dálága CSadv ;
dán% láhkáj adv ;
dánná adv ;
dánnága CSadv ;
dánnák CSadv ;
dáppebut adv ;
dáppelt adv ;
dárkkelappot adv ;
dása adv ;
dávgu adv ;
dåbbelattja adv ; !
dåbbelijda adv ; !
dåbbilijda adv ; !
dåbelis adv ; !
dåbmarit adv ;
dåhku:dåhku adv ;
dåhku:dåk SHadv ;
dåvla adv ;
dålebuttjan adv ; !adj
dåmi adv ;
dåppebuj adv ; !adj
dåppebuttjat adv ;
dåppelt adv ;
dåssju adv ;
dåvlle adv ;
edasihke adv ;
ednagit adv ;
enas adv ;
fijnnát adv ;
fámulattjat adv ;
gahtsusin adv ; !
gallen adv ;
galluga CSadv ;
galluk CSadv ;
ganna adv ;
gasskabasáldahkaj adv ; !
gasskat adv ;
gidábun adv ; !
gidán adv ; !
giejvoj adv ;
giesebun adv ; !
giesebuttjat adv ;
giehtgárddáj+Err/Orth:giet#gárddáj adv ; !AK: gieht-
giehtsuláj+Err/Orth:giet#suláj adv ; !AK: gieht-
girkkásit adv ;
gitta adv ;
goabbelis adv ; !
goarssát adv ;
goassak CSadv ;
goassak+Err/Orth:guossak CSadv ; !added because of many typos
goassik CSadv ;
goassis adv ;
guhkebuj adv ; !adj
guhkebuv adv ; !adj
guhkken adv ; !adj
guhtti adv ;
guluna adv ;
guoggot adv ;
guoktelin adv ; !derived noun
guoppus adv ;
guoros adv ;
guosnen adv ;
guovddelij adv ; !derived noun
guovtegávnagit:guovte#gávnagit adv ;
guovtu adv ;
gáhtjos adv ;
gálggot adv ;
gárggot adv ;
gáttebuj adv ; !comp noun
gáttebuttjat adv ;
gæhppadit adv ;
gådtjådærddagin:gådtjå#dærddagin adv ;
gågguk CSadv ;
gåkte adv ;
gåktu:gåk SHadv ;
gåktuk CSadv ;
gåktå adv ;
gåle adv ;
gåmu adv ;
gånnek CSadv ;
gånnåk CSadv ;
gåppus adv ;
gåsik CSadv ;
gåsis adv ;
gåsstek CSadv ;
gåsståk CSadv ;
gærddot adv ;
heli adv ;
hijoj% hájoj adv ;
huoman adv ;
háhtsagin adv ;
hájos adv ;
hálvva adv ;
hárrelåhkåj adv ; !
håjet adv ;
hærvvát adv ;
iddnáris adv ; !
iehkedis adv ; !
ieme adv ;
ienni adv ;
ierit adv ;
iesjrádálattjat adv ;
ietján+Err/Orth:etján adv ;
ihkabe adv ;
ihkeva adv ; ! OK/AK adj
ihkevij adv ;
ihki adv ;
iján adv ;
isjen adv ; !?
jahket adv ;
jalik CSadv ;
jallat adv ;
jieddnát adv ;
joarmmot adv ;
juogaláhkáj adv ;
juogguk CSadv ;
juoktá adv ;
jur adv ;
juska% vil adv ; 
jábbmot adv ;
jáhkulisát adv ;
jåddnot adv ;
jåhtelappot adv ;
jårbån adv ; !
lagábuj adv ; !adj
lagábuttjaj adv ; !adj dim
lahka adv ;
lahkusijn adv ; !noun
lajttot adv ;
lidnásit adv ;
loabddásin adv ; !
loattjet adv ;
luksa adv ;
lulebun adv ; !adj
lullelattja adv ; !  !derived noun
lullelin adv ; !   !derived noun
lullne adv ; !OK:i øst
luoboj adv ;
luojkas adv ;
lurvvot adv ;
lájttálisát adv ;
lávddábut adv ; !
låddnjot adv ;
låsemusát adv ;
mahkas adv ;
makte adv ;
manen adv ;
maŋebus adv ; !comp noun
maŋebuttjas adv ; !comp noun dim
maŋemus+Err/Orth:manemus adv ; 
maŋen adv ; !noun
maŋustahkaj adv ;
maŋŋela adv ; !    !derived noun
maŋŋelabmusin adv ; ! !derived noun
maŋŋelattja adv ; !   !derived noun
maŋŋelattjas adv ; ! !derived noun
maŋŋemus adv ; !xxx se maŋemus
maŋŋáj adv ; !noun
mieddela adv ; !
miedebuttjat adv ;
miehtelin adv ; !
miellusit adv ;
moajta adv ;
moattejienalattjat adv ;
muojon adv ;
mánnusattjat adv ;
máŋŋgi adv ;
målgan adv ;
mæhttjus adv ;
mælggadis adv ; !adj
na adv ;
nalte adv ; !
nannusabmusit adv ;
nav adv ;
navtik CSadv ;
nieljagærddáj:nielja#gærddáj adv ; !
nievrebut adv ;
njahkkot adv ;
njunjágit adv ;
njuolko adv ; !
nuolebut adv ;
nuortalulás:nuorta#lulás adv ;
nuorttaguovlulattjat adv ;
nuorttaallet:nuortta#allet adv ;
nuorttalullelattjaj:nuortta#lullelattjaj adv ; ! !cmp derived noun
nuorttalullelis:nuortta#lullelis adv ; !    !cmp derived noun
nuorttalattja adv ; !  derived noun
nuorttalin adv ; !     derived noun
nuorttat adv ;
nuppus adv ;
nálkkan adv ;
nåbe adv ;
nåvgåk adv ;
nåvte adv ;
nåvtik CSadv ;
oabllát adv ;
oalvár adv ;
oanet adv ;
oarjelt adv ;
oarjjela adv ; !derived noun
oarjjelattjan adv ; !derived noun
oarjjelullet adv ;
oastok adv ;
rahpasit adv ;
rastá adv ;
riek adv ;
rievtesláhkáj:rievtes#láhkáj adv ;
rimssot adv ;
ruopptolij adv ;
ruossot adv ;
ruvámusát adv ;
rájnna adv ;
ræhttsot adv ;
sajen adv ; !noun
sieddo adv ;
siejgga adv ; !
sielen adv ;
sijddolakkoj adv ;
sijddulakkoj adv ;
sissta adv ; !
sissŋelin adv ; !derived noun
sisŋebut adv ;
sjerrusit adv ;
sjkávttjot adv ;
sjáddnjot adv ;
skielggot adv ;
skuornnásit adv ;
slintsot adv ;
smádahkkát adv ;
smávvot adv ;
snivábut adv ;
soamesláhkáj:soames#láhkáj adv ;
steda adv ; ! ??
stávttjot adv ;
suláj adv ;
suolet adv ;
suvrrodik adv ;
sárrot adv ;
såggelij adv ; !derived noun
sæhkáj adv ; !
sæmmeláhkáj:sæmme#láhkáj adv ;
særrot adv ;
tjahkarij adv ; !
tjavgábut adv ;
tjiegŋalappot adv ;
tjielggasappot adv ;
tjierggedit adv ;
tjoahken adv ;
tjoaŋŋkuba+Err/Orth:tjoaŋŋkuba adv; !
tjuohtti adv ;
tjábbát adv ;
tjáppagit adv ;
tjæggŋot adv ;
tsarnnot adv ;
tsuovkas adv ;
tsápptsot adv ;
uddnik CSadv ;
uksaguoran:uksa#guoran adv ; ! cmp noun
uksela adv ; !derived noun
ulmmelattjat adv ;
unnet adv ;
unugit adv ;
vajuk adv ;
validijn adv ; !?? rámádis
vallak CSadv ;
valljet adv ;
valágij adv ; !
vargga adv ;
vassját adv ;
vas adv ;
vavddagin adv ;
vehik CSadv ;
viddnjot adv ;
viehka:viehka adv ; 
viehka:viek SHadv ;
vihtti adv ;
vijddásappot adv ;
vilá adv ;
vissásappot adv ;
vuogasláhkáj:vuogas#láhkáj adv ;
vuojn adv ;
vuoksjuj adv ;
vuolebuttja adv ; !compnoun dim
vuolen adv ; !noun
vuollegit adv ;
vuollelattjaj adv ; ! derived noun
vuollelis adv ; !    derived noun
vuollálakkoj adv ;
vuoppsát adv ;
vuorjját adv ;
vuosstelin adv ; !
vuosstáj adv ;
vádálabmusit adv ;
vájuk adv ;
várnnahit adv ;
várálabmusit adv ;
váttugit adv ;
vælggodahttá adv ;
værámusát adv ;
ájbas adv ;
ájgás adv ;
ájn adv ;
ájnnasik adv ;
ájtsak adv ;
ájádalák CSadv ;
álgos adv ;
álkket adv ;
álubuttja adv ;
ándagisáv adv ; !
áradissaj adv ; !noun
ármet adv ;
áttjak adv ;
åbbå adv ;
åbbånagá adv ; !XXXse åbbånagi 
åjtu adv ;
ålggolattja adv ; !!derived noun
ålggolij adv ; ! !derived noun
ålggot adv ;
ålgus adv ;
ålobut adv ;
åppå adv ;
åvddåj adv ; !
åvddålattja adv ; ! derived noun
åvddålijguovlluj:åvddålij#guovlluj adv ; !
åvdebuj adv ; !adj
åvdebuttjan adv ; !adj dim
åvdemusát adv ;
åvtláhkáj:åvt#láhkáj adv ; !
åvvånagi adv ;
ænndu adv ;
vájválattjat adv ;
vielggás adv ; !MT barggus
